Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.140

Enforcing officers not personally liable for costs.

No officer performing any duty under any of the provisions of RCW 28A.225.010 through 28A.225.140, or under the provisions of any rules that may be passed in pursuance hereof, shall in any wise become liable for any costs that may accrue in the performance of any duty prescribed by RCW 28A.225.010 through 28A.225.140.

[ 1990 c 33 s 231; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.27.130. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 368 s 12; RRS s 5083; prior: 1907 c 231 s 13; 1905 c 162 s 12. Formerly RCW 28A.27.130, 28.27.130.]